District of Columbia statutes.
2-355.02

Cost-reimbursement contracts.

(a)

A cost-reimbursement contract shall not be awarded pursuant to § 2-354.02, § 2-354.03, or § 2-354.04 unless there is a determination and findings that:

(1)

The contract is likely to be less costly to the District than any other type of contract; or

(2)

It is impracticable to obtain goods or services of the kind or quality required except under a cost-reimbursement contract.

(b)

All cost-reimbursement contracts shall contain a provision that only costs determined in writing to be reimbursable by the contracting officer, in accordance with cost principles set forth in rules issued pursuant to this chapter, shall be reimbursable.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 502, 58 DCR 1185